California, session 20252026, AB1394.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Part 6.23 (commencing with Section 1179.803) is added to Division 1 of the Health and Safety Code, to read:PART 6.23. Personal Opioid Disposal Systems1179.803. (a) In order to reduce the rate of misuse, diversion, and fatal overdose from prescription opioid drugs, the State Department of Public Health shall, subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose, establish and administer a statewide program that awards funding to local health departments, local government agencies, or, on a competitive basis, to community-based organizations, regional opioid prevention coalitions, or both, to distribute a personal opioid drug deactivation and disposal systems system to individuals to encourage safe and environmentally responsible disposal practices and mitigate risks associated with unused or expired prescription and illicit opioids. (b) If In establishing and administering the statewide program described in subdivision (a), the department shall do all of the following: (1) Establish guidelines for the evidence-based, environmentally safe safe, and effective use of personal opioid drug deactivation and disposal systems.(2) Provide an online portal for individuals to request a personal opioid disposal system. an initial and any additional personal opioid drug deactivation and disposal systems.(3) Prioritize communities disproportionately affected by the opioid crisis when distributing resources under the statewide program. (4) Deliver, via the United States Postal Service, a personal opioid drug deactivation and disposal system with an enclosed educational and informational card to those households in localities deemed at highest risk. (c) For purposes of this section, “personal opioid drug deactivation and disposal system” means a portable product designed for a patient’s personal use for the purpose of allowing the patient of a prescribed drug containing an opioid to deactivate and permanently render the prescribed drug containing an opioid to a nonretrievable and nonabusable condition or state.